Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1562
Annual grants; separate application.

All grants under section 81-1561 shall be made on an annual basis. A separate application shall be required for each grant sought.

Laws 1979, LB 120, § 29.
September 30, 2025